Wisconsin, session 2025, AB848.
do enact as follows:AB848,11Section 1. 15.465 (1) of the statutes is created to read:AB848,2,4215.465 (1) Autonomous driving safety board. There is created in the 3department of transportation an autonomous driving safety board. The board shall 4consist of the following 6 members, who shall serve 3-year terms:AB848,2,55(a) One member appointed by the speaker of the assembly.AB848,2,66(b) One member appointed by the majority leader of the senate.AB848,2,77(c) One member appointed by the minority leader of the assembly.AB848,2,88(d) One member appointed by the minority leader of the senate.AB848,2,109(e) One member, appointed by the governor, who is an employee of the 10department of transportation.AB848,2,1211(f) One member, appointed by the governor, who is an employee of the state 12traffic patrol. AB848,213Section 2. 340.01 (46m) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB848,2,1514340.01 (46m) (d) If the person is operating an autonomous vehicle, as defined 15in s. 346.921 (1) (b), an alcohol concentration of more than 0.02.AB848,316Section 3. 346.921 of the statutes is created to read:AB848,2,1817346.921 Operation of autonomous vehicles on highways. (1) 18Definitions. AB848,3,41(a) “Automated driving system” means hardware and software that, when 2installed and engaged, are capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task 3on highways on a sustained basis, regardless of whether the automated driving 4system is limited to a specific operational design domain.AB848,3,65(b) “Autonomous vehicle” means a motor vehicle equipped with a Level 4 6automated driving system or a Level 5 automated driving system. AB848,3,77(c) “Board” means the autonomous driving safety board.AB848,3,108(d) “Level 4 automated driving system” means an automated driving system 9with a standard of automation that meets the criteria for Level 4 specified in SAE 10International Standard J3016_202104.AB848,3,1311(e) “Level 5 automated driving system” means an automated driving system 12with a standard of automation that meets the criteria for Level 5 specified in SAE 13International Standard J3016_202104. AB848,3,1614(f) “Minimal risk condition” means a stable and stopped condition to which an 15individual or automated driving system may bring an autonomous vehicle to reduce 16the risk of a collision when operation should not or may not be continued. AB848,3,1717(g) “Municipality” means a county, city, village, or town.AB848,3,2118(h) “Operational design domain” means the operating conditions under which 19an automated driving system or feature of the automated driving system is 20specifically designed to function, including geographical and environmental 21conditions and time-of-day restrictions.AB848,3,2322(i) “Permit” means a permit issued by the board to an applicant under sub. (2) 23(d).AB848,4,224(j) “Permit holder” means a person granted authorization by the board under 1sub. (2) (d) to operate autonomous vehicles on highways in this state, including to 2transport passengers for hire, as provided in this section.AB848,4,43(2) Permit required. (a) No person may operate an autonomous vehicle on 4a highway in this state unless all of the following apply:AB848,4,551. The board has issued a permit for the operation under par. (d).AB848,4,762. The board has approved the highway for autonomous vehicle operation 7under sub. (3).AB848,4,118(b) Prior to operating an autonomous vehicle on a highway in this state, a 9person shall submit an application for a permit to the board that defines the initial 10operational design domain for their operations and certifies to the board that the 11autonomous vehicle is capable of achieving a minimal risk condition.AB848,4,1412(c) Upon receipt of an application under par. (b), the board shall schedule a 13public hearing. No less than 60 days prior to the public hearing, the board shall 14provide notice of the hearing.AB848,4,2115(d) No later than 30 days following the public hearing under par. (c), the board 16shall approve or deny an application submitted under par. (b). A two-thirds vote of 17the board is required to approve any application. If the board approves an 18application, the board shall issue a permit to the applicant. The board shall provide 19notice of each permit it grants to the board of supervisors and county law 20enforcement agency in each county where operation of autonomous vehicles is 21authorized.AB848,5,222(e) Any changes to a permit, including changes to the operational design 23domain, shall be submitted to the board. The board shall provide notice of any 1changes to a permit to the board of supervisors and county law enforcement agency 2in each county where operation of autonomous vehicles is authorized.AB848,5,43(f) Only the board may approve permit applications, and no municipality may 4require any additional approval for operation of an autonomous vehicle.AB848,5,65(3) Approval of highways required. (a) Subject to par. (b), the board may 6approve operation under sub. (2) (d) on any highway located in this state.AB848,5,87(b) The board may not approve operation of an autonomous vehicle on any 8highway that is part of the national system of interstate and defense highways.AB848,5,109(4) Permitted activities. (a) A permit holder may not operate an 10autonomous vehicle on any highway in this state unless all of the following apply:AB848,5,12111. The permit holder titles and registers with the department each 12autonomous vehicle to be operated.AB848,5,15132. The permit holder provides the department proof of financial responsibility 14as provided under s. 344.29 or 344.62 for any damages, injury, or death caused by 15the operation of an autonomous vehicle.AB848,5,18163. The permit holder provides the board with information detailing how a 17person providing law enforcement, firefighting, or emergency medical services 18should interact with autonomous vehicles for which the permit is issued.AB848,5,2119(b) A permit holder may operate an autonomous vehicle with the automated 20driving system engaged, including to transport passengers for hire, regardless of 21whether a human driver is physically present in the autonomous vehicle. AB848,6,322(5) Suspension and revocation of permits. (a) If the board determines 23that the operation of an autonomous vehicle is an unreasonable risk to public safety, 24the board may temporarily suspend the permit authorizing operation of the 1autonomous vehicle. The board shall report the suspension to the permit holder, 2which may not operate an autonomous vehicle under the permit until the board 3makes a determination under par. (b).AB848,6,114(b) If the board determines that there is evidence that a permit should be 5suspended or revoked, the board shall schedule a hearing and notify the permit 6holder of the hearing. Following the hearing, the board may suspend or revoke a 7permit if the board determines that there is a violation of any condition specified in 8the permit or that the continued operation of autonomous vehicles under the permit 9would be an unreasonable risk to public safety. If the board determines that there 10is not cause to suspend or revoke the permit, the permit holder may immediately 11resume operations under the permit.AB848,6,1512(6) Reporting. A permit holder shall annually submit to the board a report 13summarizing results and observations related to safety, traffic operations, 14interaction with roadway infrastructure, comments from the public, and any other 15matters the permit holder determines are relevant.AB848,6,1816(7) Penalty. Any person operating an autonomous vehicle without a valid 17permit that has not been suspended or revoked may be required to forfeit not more 18than $1,000.AB848,419Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB848,6,2220(1) Autonomous driving safety board. Notwithstanding the length of 21terms specified in s. 15.465 (1), the initial terms of the members of the autonomous 22driving safety board appointed under s. 15.465 (1) (a) to (f) expire on May 1, 2029. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab848 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab848 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB848 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB848 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB848: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting